Mississippi, session 2026, SB2647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-7-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-7-21.  (1)  From and after October 1, 1985, there will be no fees for the services of the tax collector, with the exception of taxes collected for taxing authorities other than the board of supervisors.  For collecting taxes for authorities other than the board of supervisors, the fee shall be five percent (5%) of the taxes collected or an amount authorized by contract between the county and the outside taxing authority.  A tax collector shall keep a complete account of every such fee collected and shall file an itemized statement thereof monthly, under oath, with the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county who shall preserve same as a part of the records of the office.  The tax collector shall make a remittance to the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county on or before the twentieth of each month for deposit into the general fund of the county of all said fees collected during the preceding month. (2)  For the purpose of the limitations set forth in Section 27-39-321, commissions for levies set by the board of supervisors shall be added to base collections of the general county fund for the 1984-1985 year only. (3)  Fees of publisher for publication - to the publishers, payable by the delinquent taxpayer, and to be collected and paid over by the tax collectors; or if the land be sold to the state to be paid by the state: For each separate publication advertising lands for sale for taxes, for each separately described subdivision, as described and set out in the assessment rolls for the county..$ * * * 1.50 3.00, and shall increase each year starting July 1, 2027, at a rate comparable to the Consumer Price Index (CPI). (4)  Fees of chancery clerk for collection of delinquent taxes: (a)  For abstracting the list of lands sold for taxes, for each separately described section or subdivision lot ......................................................... $ 1.00 (b)  For filing and recording deed to land sold for taxes the fee provided in Section 25-7-9(1)(b). (c)  For abstracting each deed in the sectional index, per section or subdivision lot................................ $ 1.00 (d)  For each recording redemption the fee provided in Section 25-7-9(1)(b). (e)  For abstracting each redemption in the sectional index, per section or subdivision lot............................ $ 1.00 (f)  And, in addition, three percent (3%) on the amount necessary to redeem. The several officers' fees shall be collected by the tax collector or chancery clerk and paid over to those entitled to same. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.